Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4313
(UDTA 13) Limitation of action against trust director.

(UDTA 13) (a) An action against a trust director for breach of trust must be commenced within the same limitation period as under section 30-3894 for an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

(b) A report or accounting has the same effect on the limitation period for an action against a trust director for breach of trust that the report or accounting would have under section 30-3894 in an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 13.